Utah statutes.
16-10a-603.   Issued and outstanding shares.
(1)  A corporation may issue the number of shares of each class or series
authorized by the articles of incorporation.  Shares that are issued are
outstanding shares until they are reacquired, redeemed, converted, or
cancelled.
(2)  The reacquisition, redemption, or conversion of outstanding shares is
subject to the limitations of Subsection (3) and to Section 16-10a-640.
(3)  At all times that shares of the corporation are outstanding, one or more
shares that together have unlimited voting rights and one or more shares that
together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon
dissolution must be outstanding.
